Utah statutes.
16-6a-1405.   Effect of dissolution.
(1)  A dissolved nonprofit corporation continues its corporate existence but
may not carry on any activities except as is appropriate to wind up and
liquidate its affairs, including:
(a)  collecting its assets;
(b)  returning, transferring, or conveying assets held by the nonprofit
corporation upon a condition requiring return, transfer, or conveyance, which
condition occurs by reason of the dissolution, in accordance with the
condition;
(c)  transferring, subject to any contractual or legal requirements, its
assets as provided in or authorized by its articles of incorporation or
bylaws;
(d)  discharging or making provision for discharging its liabilities; and
(e)  doing every other act necessary to wind up and liquidate its assets and
affairs.
(2)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the distribution of
assets of a nonprofit corporation upon its dissolution shall be consistent
with all applicable requirements and limitations set forth in the Internal
Revenue Code.
(3)  Dissolution of a nonprofit corporation does not:
(a)  transfer title to the nonprofit corporation's property including title to
water rights, water conveyance facilities, or other assets of a nonprofit
corporation organized to divert or distribute water to its members;
(b)  subject its directors or officers to standards of conduct different from
those prescribed in this chapter;
(c)  change quorum or voting requirements for its board of directors or
members;
(d)  change provisions for selection, resignation, or removal of its directors
or officers, or both;
(e)  change provisions for amending its bylaws or its articles of
incorporation;
(f)  prevent commencement of a proceeding by or against the nonprofit
corporation in its corporate name; or
(g)  abate or suspend a proceeding pending by or against the nonprofit
corporation on the effective date of dissolution.
(4)  Nothing in this section may be applied in a manner inconsistent with a
court's power of judicial dissolution exercised in accordance with Section
16-6a-1414 or 16-6a-1415.
